Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.050

Applications for aid—Recommendations.

All applications by school districts for state assistance in providing school plant facilities shall be made to the superintendent of public instruction. Studies and surveys shall be conducted by the superintendent for the purpose of securing information relating to (1) the kind and extent of the school plant facilities required and the urgency of need for such facilities in districts that seek state assistance, (2) the ability of such districts to provide capital outlay funds by local effort, (3) the need for improvement of school administrative units and school attendance areas among or within such districts, and (4) any other pertinent matters. Recommendations respecting action on the applications shall be submitted to the superintendent of public instruction.

[ 2006 c 263 s 303; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.47.080. Prior: 1947 c 278 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4940-15. Formerly RCW 28A.47.080, 28.47.080.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.